South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 41-8-50(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) Upon a finding of an occurrence involving a violation after an investigation pursuant to subsection (A), or after a random audit pursuant to Section 41-8-120(B), where the director considered all information or evidence gathered by the director and any information or evidence submitted by the private employer demonstrating compliance with the provisions of this chapter: (1)(a) prior to July 1, 2012, for a first occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20, the private employer shall, upon notification by the director of a violation of Section 41-8-20, swear or affirm in writing that the private employer has complied with the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Section 1324a from the effective date of this section to the time the private employer received notification from the director, and shall comply with the provisions of Section 41-8-20 within three business days. Failure to swear or affirm compliance in writing or failure to comply with Section 41-8-20 within three business days requires that the private employer be placed on probation for a period of one year, during which time the private employer shall submit quarterly reports to the director demonstrating compliance with the provisions of Section 41-8-20. The director shall provide appropriate assistance to the private employer to aid the private employer in complying with Section 41-8-20 within the three business day period. The director may extend the three business day period, as necessary, if the director determines that more time is required for compliance. Any subsequent occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20 by the private employer must result in the suspension of the private employer's licenses for at least ten days, but not more than thirty days, by the director, except, if a private employer has not committed a violation of Section 41-8-20 within the previous three years, a subsequent occurrence must be treated as a first occurrence. If a private employer has ever committed a violation of Section 41-8-30, the private employer's licenses must be suspended for at least ten days but not more than thirty days for any violation or subsequent occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20. The director shall verify the work authorization status of the employees with the federal government pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Section 1373(c) and notify the private employer of the results. The private employer shall immediately terminate an employee whose work authorization was not verified upon being notified by the director. The director shall notify federal, state, and local law enforcement officials of any suspected unauthorized aliens employed by the private employer; (b) on or after July 1, 2012, for a first occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20, the private employer shall, upon notification by the director of a violation of Section 41-8-20, immediately comply with the provisions of Section 41-8-20, and the private employer must be placed on probation for a period of one year, during which time the private employer shall submit quarterly reports to the director demonstrating compliance with the provisions of Section 41-8-20. Any subsequent occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20 by the private employer must result in the suspension of the private employer's licenses for at least ten days but not more than thirty days by the director, except, if a private employer has not committed a violation of Section 41-8-20 within the previous three years, a subsequent occurrence must be treated as a first occurrence. If a private employer has ever committed a violation of Section 41-8-30, the private employer's licenses must be suspended for at least tentwenty days but not more than thirtysixty days for any violation or subsequent occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-20. The director shall verify the work authorization status of the employees with the federal government pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Section 1373(c) and notify the private employer of the results. The private employer shall immediately terminate an employee whose work authorization was not verified upon being notified by the director. The director shall notify federal, state, and local law enforcement officials of any suspected unauthorized aliens employed by the private employer; (2) for a first occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-30, the private employer's licenses must be suspended, and must remain suspended for at least ten days but not more than thirtysixty days. During the period of suspension, the private employer may not engage in business, open to the public, employ an employee, or otherwise operate. After the period of suspension, the private employer's licenses must be reinstated, permitting the private employer to engage in business and to employ an employee, if the private employer: (a) demonstrates that the private employer has terminated the unauthorized alien; and (b) pays a reinstatement fee equal to the cost of investigating and enforcing the matter, provided that the reinstatement fee must not exceed one thousand dollars; (3) for a second occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-30, the private employer's licenses must be suspended, and must remain suspended for at least thirty days but not more than sixtyninety days. During the period of suspension, the private employer may not engage in business, open to the public, employ an employee, or otherwise operate. After the period of suspension, the private employer's licenses must be reinstated, permitting the private employer to engage in business, open to the public, employ an employee, and otherwise operate, if the private employer: (a) demonstrates that the private employer has terminated the unauthorized alien; and (b) pays a reinstatement fee equal to the cost of investigating and enforcing the matter, provided that the reinstatement fee must not exceed onefive thousand dollars; (4) for a third or subsequent occurrence involving a violation of Section 41-8-30, the private employer's licenses must be revoked, and the private employer may not engage in business, open to the public, employ an employee, or otherwise operate. For a third occurrence only, after ninety days, a private employer may petition the director for a provisional license. A provisional license permits a private employer to engage in business, open to the public, employ an employee, and otherwise operate. The director may grant the private employer permission to apply for a provisional license if the private employer: (a) agrees to be on probation for a period of three years, during which time the private employer shall submit quarterly reports to the director demonstrating compliance with the provisions of Sections 41-8-20 and 41-8-30; (b) demonstrates that the private employer has terminated the unauthorized alien; and (c) pays a reinstatement fee equal to the cost of investigating and enforcing the matter, provided that the reinstatement fee must not exceed onefive thousand dollars. For all other occurrences where a private employer's licenses are revoked, the private employer may not seek reinstatement of the private employer's licenses for a period of five years. After five years, the director may grant reinstatement of a private employer's licenses if the private employer: (a) agrees to be on probation for a period of three years, during which time the private employer shall submit quarterly reports to the director demonstrating compliance with the provisions of Sections 41-8-20 and 41-8-30; (b) demonstrates that the private employer has terminated the unauthorized alien; and (c) pays a reinstatement fee equal to the cost of investigating and adjudicating the matter, provided that the reinstatement fee must not exceed onefive thousand dollars. (5) If a private employer engages in business or employs a new employee during the period that the private employer's licenses are suspended, the private employer's licenses must be revoked, and must not be reinstated for a period of five years, and only upon a determination by the director that the private employer has complied with the provisions of item (4) of this subsection. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----